California, session 20252026, AB705.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 307.6 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:307.6.(a)The commission shall appoint a chief internal auditor, who shall hold office at the pleasure of the commission.307.6. (a) As of January 1, 2026, the internal audit unit of the commission and its staff shall be transferred to the Independent Office of Audits and Investigations, which is hereby established within the commission to ensure all of the following:(1) The commission is administering ratepayer funds efficiently, effectively, economically, and in compliance with applicable state and federal requirements.(2) The commission’s programs are functioning consistent with applicable accounting standards and practices and are administered effectively, efficiently, and economically.(3) The commission is accomplishing mandated requirements, developing an annual audit plan, administering an effective enterprise risk management program, and is making efficient, effective, and financially responsible decisions.(4) The President of the Commission, the Legislature, and the Governor are fully informed concerning fraud, improper activities, and other serious abuses or deficiencies relating to the expenditure of ratepayer funds or the administration of commission programs and operations.(b) The chief internal auditor office shall be responsible for the oversight of the internal audit unit and shall plan, initiate, and perform audits of key financial, management, operational, and information technology functions within the commission to improve accountability and transparency to executive and state management.(c)The chief internal auditor shall report his or her findings and recommendations directly to an audit subcommittee of the commission.(d)The chief internal auditor shall comply with Part 3.5 (commencing with Section 13885) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(c) The director of the office shall have the title of Inspector General and shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation. The Inspector General shall serve a six-year term and shall not be removed from office during that term, except for good cause. Any basis for removal of the Inspector General shall be stated in writing and shall be sent to the Secretary of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the Assembly at the time of the removal and shall be deemed to be a public document.(d) The Inspector General shall be vested with the full authority to exercise all responsibility for maintaining a full-scope, independent, and objective audit and investigation program.(e) The office shall have the access and authority to examine all records, files, documents, accounts, reports, correspondence, or other property of the commission, public utilities, and other entities regulated by the commission. The office may enter any public office or institution in this state, during regular business hours, and access, examine, and reproduce all records, files, documents, accounts, reports, vouchers, correspondence files, and all other records for any audit or investigation. An officer or employee of an agency or entity that has records or property in their possession or under their control, or otherwise has access to records, shall permit access to, and examination and reproduction thereof, upon the request of the Inspector General or the Inspector General’s authorized representative.(f) In order to achieve independence and objectivity pursuant to this section, the Inspector General shall do both of the following:(1) The Inspector General shall report all audit and confidential investigation findings and recommendations made under the Inspector General’s jurisdiction to the Governor and Legislature on an ongoing and current basis.(2) The Inspector General shall report at least annually, or upon request, to the Governor and the Legislature with a summary of the Inspector General’s investigation and audit findings and recommendations. The summary shall be posted on the office’s internet website and shall otherwise be made available to the public upon its release to the Governor, the commission, and the Legislature. The summary shall include, but not be limited to, significant problems discovered by the Inspector General and whether the Inspector General’s recommendations relative to audits and investigations have been implemented by the affected units and programs of the commission or affected external entities.(3) A report submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SECTION 1.Section 1701 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:1701.(a)All hearings, investigations, and proceedings shall be governed by this part and by the rules of practice and procedure adopted by the commission, and in the conduct thereof the technical rules of evidence need not be applied. An informality in a hearing, investigation, or proceeding or in the manner of taking testimony shall not invalidate an order, decision, or rule made, approved, or confirmed by the commission.(b)Notwithstanding Section 11425.10 of the Government Code, Articles 1 to 15, inclusive, of Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code do not apply to a hearing by the commission under this code. The Administrative Adjudication Code of Ethics (Article 16 (commencing with Section 11475) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall apply to administrative law judges of the commission.(c)It is the intent of the Legislature to adopt further revisions to this section. SEC. 2.Section 1701.5 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:1701.5.(a)Except as specified in subdivision (b), in a ratesetting or quasi-legislative case, the commission shall resolve the issues raised in the scoping memo within 18 months of the date the proceeding is initiated.(b)Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the commission may specify in a scoping memo a resolution date later than 18 months from the date the proceeding is initiated, if that scoping memo includes specific reasons for the necessity of a later date and the commissioner assigned to the case approves the date.